District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.16

Information about post-employment benefit plans.

Upon a request of the District of Columbia Retirement Board, the Mayor, the Chief Financial Officer, the Chairman of the District of Columbia Public Charter School Board, the President of the Board of Education, or their successors, shall furnish to the Retirement Board information with respect to health benefit plans that the Retirement Board considers necessary to enable it to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2116
as added Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 5(e), 52 DCR 2638